Hawaii, session 2025, HB965.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that microplastic pollution from washing machines can result in substantial wastewater pollution. According to a study published by the Marine Biology and Ecology Research Centre of the University of Plymouth, each load of domestic laundry could release over 700,000 microscopic fibers into wastewater and likely pass through sewage treatment and into the environment. The legislature further finds that microplastic pollution into wastewater poses a significant threat to marine ecosystems and human health.  Washing machines have been proven to be a substantial source of microplastic pollution as synthetic fibers shed from textiles and are released into wastewater, which eventually ends up in our oceans.  To quantify the scale of microfibers in the ocean caused by laundry alone, thirty-five per cent of global releases of microplastics to oceans are thought to be caused by washing clothes. The legislature further finds that the installation of washing machine microplastic filtration systems in residential and commercial washing machines can help to mitigate microplastic pollution.  A washing machine microplastic filtration system works by capturing microplastic fibers that are pulled off laundry while in the wash, subsequently preventing the fibers from entering wastewater.  Washing machine microplastic filtration systems contribute to a decrease of plastic pollution in wastewater. The legislature further finds that offering a financial incentive to residential and commercial washing machine owners to mitigate the costs of purchasing the microplastic filtration device could help increase the usage of washing machine microplastic filtration systems. The purpose of this Act is to create a rebate program that mitigates the cost of purchasing residential and commercial washing machine microplastic filters. SECTION 2.  Chapter 174C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§174C-     Microplastic filtration rebate program.  (a) The department, in consultation with the commission, shall administer a microplastic filtration rebate program that incentivizes the purchase and installation of microplastic filtration systems for washing machines or washing machines equipped with a microplastic filtration system. (b)  Each eligible purchase and installation of a microplastic filtration system for a residential or commercial washing machine or a residential or commercial washing machine equipped with a microplastic filtration system shall be entitled to the following rebate amounts or the retail cost, whichever amount is lower: (1)  $ for a microplastic filtration system for a residential washing machine; (2)  $ for a microplastic filtration system for a commercial washing machine; (3)  $ for a residential washing machine equipped with a microplastic filtration system; and (4)  $ for a commercial washing machine equipped with a microplastic filtration system. (c)  The department shall: (1)  Prepare any forms that may be necessary for an applicant to claim a rebate pursuant to this section; (2)  Require each applicant to furnish reasonable information to ascertain the validity of the claim; and (3)  Conduct outreach and education efforts to promote the rebate program. (d)  Applicants shall submit an application to the department within twelve months of the date of purchase or installation, whichever is later, to claim a rebate from the rebate program.  Failure to apply within twelve months of the date of purchase or installation, whichever is later, shall constitute a waiver of the right to claim the rebate. (e)  This section shall apply to microplastic filtration systems and washing machines equipped with a microplastic filtration system purchased and installed after July 1, 2025." SECTION 3.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be deposited into the water resource management fund under section 174C-5.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for the microplastic filtration systems for washing machines rebate program. SECTION 4.  There is appropriated out of the water resource management fund the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the administration of the microplastic filtration rebate program. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of land and natural resources for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________